apertium-sv-da/dev/saldo/saldo.nouns.dix
<pardef n="gupp/y__n_ut">
  <e>       <p><l>y</l>         <r>y<s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ys</l>        <r>y<s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>yn</l>        <r>y<s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>yns</l>       <r>y<s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ies</l>       <r>y<s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>yer</l>       <r>y<s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ies</l>       <r>y<s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>yers</l>      <r>y<s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>yerna</l>     <r>y<s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>iesarna</l>   <r>y<s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>yernas</l>    <r>y<s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>iesarnas</l>  <r>y<s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>
<pardef n="halvankar/e__n_v">
  <e>       <p><l>e</l>         <r>e<s n="n"/><s n="v"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>es</l>        <r>e<s n="n"/><s n="v"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>et</l>        <r>e<s n="n"/><s n="v"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>en</l>        <r>e<s n="n"/><s n="v"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ets</l>       <r>e<s n="n"/><s n="v"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ens</l>       <r>e<s n="n"/><s n="v"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>e</l>         <r>e<s n="n"/><s n="v"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>en</l>        <r>e<s n="n"/><s n="v"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>es</l>        <r>e<s n="n"/><s n="v"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ens</l>       <r>e<s n="n"/><s n="v"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>na</l>        <r>e<s n="n"/><s n="v"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>nas</l>       <r>e<s n="n"/><s n="v"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>
<pardef n="tyg__n_nt">
  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>s</l>         <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>et</l>        <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ets</l>       <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>er</l>        <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ers</l>       <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>s</l>         <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>erna</l>      <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>en</l>        <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ernas</l>     <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ens</l>       <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>
<pardef n="get__n_ut">
  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>s</l>         <r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>en</l>        <r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ens</l>       <r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ter</l>       <r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ters</l>      <r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>terna</l>     <r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ternas</l>    <r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>
<pardef n="aorta__n_ut">
  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>s</l>         <r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>n</l>         <r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>s</l>         <r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ns</l>        <r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>
<pardef n="u__n_nt">
  <e>       <p><l>u</l>         <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>:s</l>        <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>-s</l>        <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>-et</l>       <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>-t</l>        <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>:et</l>       <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>:t</l>        <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>-ets</l>      <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>-ts</l>       <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>:ets</l>      <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>:ts</l>       <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>:n</l>        <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>-n</l>        <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>:ns</l>       <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>-ns</l>       <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>-na</l>       <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>:na</l>       <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>-nas</l>      <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>:nas</l>      <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<e lm="nitrat">          <i>nitrat</i><par n="tyg__n_nt"/></e>
<e lm="medikament">      <i>medikament</i><par n="tyg__n_nt"/></e>
<e lm="dummy">           <i>dumm</i><par n="gupp/y__n_ut"/></e>
<e lm="arbetsprov">      <i>arbetsprov</i><par n="tyg__n_nt"/></e>
<e lm="mönstergarn">     <i>mönstergarn</i><par n="tyg__n_nt"/></e>
<e lm="märkgarn">        <i>märkgarn</i><par n="tyg__n_nt"/></e>
<e lm="varuprov">        <i>varuprov</i><par n="tyg__n_nt"/></e>
<e lm="andningsenzym">   <i>andningsenzym</i><par n="tyg__n_nt"/></e>
<e lm="allergen">        <i>allergen</i><par n="tyg__n_nt"/></e>
<e lm="hypofyshormon">   <i>hypofyshormon</i><par n="tyg__n_nt"/></e>
<e lm="vattenprov">      <i>vattenprov</i><par n="tyg__n_nt"/></e>
<e lm="salivprov">       <i>salivprov</i><par n="tyg__n_nt"/></e>
<e lm="gelänk">          <i>gelänk</i><par n="tyg__n_nt"/></e>
<e lm="lysozym">         <i>lysozym</i><par n="tyg__n_nt"/></e>
<e lm="nuklein">         <i>nuklein</i><par n="tyg__n_nt"/></e>
<e lm="ylletyg">         <i>ylletyg</i><par n="tyg__n_nt"/></e>
<e lm="tillväxthormon">  <i>tillväxthormon</i><par n="tyg__n_nt"/></e>
<e lm="natriumnitrat">   <i>natriumnitrat</i><par n="tyg__n_nt"/></e>
<e lm="ponny">           <i>ponn</i><par n="gupp/y__n_ut"/></e>
<e lm="gryn">            <i>gryn</i><par n="tyg__n_nt"/></e>
<e lm="tygprov">         <i>tygprov</i><par n="tyg__n_nt"/></e>
<e lm="halvankare">      <i>halvankar</i><par n="halvankar/e__n_v"/></e>
<e lm="dinatriumvätefosfat"><i>dinatriumvätefosfat</i><par n="tyg__n_nt"/></e>
<e lm="äggviteprov">     <i>äggviteprov</i><par n="tyg__n_nt"/></e>
<e lm="ättled">          <i>ättled</i><par n="tyg__n_nt"/></e>
<e lm="neuron">          <i>neuron</i><par n="tyg__n_nt"/></e>
<e lm="shetlandsponny">  <i>shetlandsponn</i><par n="gupp/y__n_ut"/></e>
<e lm="könshormon">      <i>könshormon</i><par n="tyg__n_nt"/></e>
<e lm="tyg">             <i>tyg</i><par n="tyg__n_nt"/></e>
<e lm="sköldkörtelhormon"><i>sköldkörtelhormon</i><par n="tyg__n_nt"/></e>
<e lm="prov">            <i>prov</i><par n="tyg__n_nt"/></e>
<e lm="akrostikon">      <i>akrostikon</i><par n="tyg__n_nt"/></e>
<e lm="u">               <i>u</i><par n="u__n_nt"/></e>
<e lm="dandy">           <i>dand</i><par n="gupp/y__n_ut"/></e>
<e lm="appellativ">      <i>appellativ</i><par n="tyg__n_nt"/></e>
<e lm="vant">            <i>vant</i><par n="tyg__n_nt"/></e>
<e lm="cellulosanitrat"> <i>cellulosanitrat</i><par n="tyg__n_nt"/></e>
<e lm="försäljningsled"> <i>försäljningsled</i><par n="tyg__n_nt"/></e>
<e lm="acetat">          <i>acetat</i><par n="tyg__n_nt"/></e>
<e lm="hydrat">          <i>hydrat</i><par n="tyg__n_nt"/></e>
<e lm="lystergarn">      <i>lystergarn</i><par n="tyg__n_nt"/></e>
<e lm="predikament">     <i>predikament</i><par n="tyg__n_nt"/></e>
<e lm="guppy">           <i>gupp</i><par n="gupp/y__n_ut"/></e>
<e lm="hormon">          <i>hormon</i><par n="tyg__n_nt"/></e>
<e lm="opiat">           <i>opiat</i><par n="tyg__n_nt"/></e>
<e lm="silkegarn">       <i>silkegarn</i><par n="tyg__n_nt"/></e>
<e lm="rekvisit">        <i>rekvisit</i><par n="tyg__n_nt"/></e>
<e lm="pejorativ">       <i>pejorativ</i><par n="tyg__n_nt"/></e>
<e lm="slipprov">        <i>slipprov</i><par n="tyg__n_nt"/></e>
<e lm="changemang">      <i>changemang</i><par n="tyg__n_nt"/></e>
<e lm="fibrin">          <i>fibrin</i><par n="tyg__n_nt"/></e>
<e lm="angoraget">       <i>angoraget</i><par n="get__n_ut"/></e>
<e lm="pinjenöt">        <i>pinjenöt</i><par n="get__n_ut"/></e>
<e lm="alpget">          <i>alpget</i><par n="get__n_ut"/></e>
<e lm="schweizernöt">    <i>schweizernöt</i><par n="get__n_ut"/></e>
<e lm="stenget">         <i>stenget</i><par n="get__n_ut"/></e>
<e lm="jordnöt">         <i>jordnöt</i><par n="get__n_ut"/></e>
<e lm="dubbelnöt">       <i>dubbelnöt</i><par n="get__n_ut"/></e>
<e lm="benget">          <i>benget</i><par n="get__n_ut"/></e>
<e lm="betelnöt">        <i>betelnöt</i><par n="get__n_ut"/></e>
<e lm="valnöt">          <i>valnöt</i><par n="get__n_ut"/></e>
<e lm="pekannöt">        <i>pekannöt</i><par n="get__n_ut"/></e>
<e lm="get">             <i>get</i><par n="get__n_ut"/></e>
<e lm="kokosnöt">        <i>kokosnöt</i><par n="get__n_ut"/></e>
<e lm="muskotnöt">       <i>muskotnöt</i><par n="get__n_ut"/></e>
<e lm="hasselnöt">       <i>hasselnöt</i><par n="get__n_ut"/></e>
<e lm="nöt">             <i>nöt</i><par n="get__n_ut"/></e>
<e lm="råget">           <i>råget</i><par n="get__n_ut"/></e>
<e lm="paranöt">         <i>paranöt</i><par n="get__n_ut"/></e>
<e lm="aorta">           <i>aorta</i><par n="aorta__n_ut"/></e>
